Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2913
Community Development Assistance Act, how cited.

Sections 77-2913 to 77-2920 shall be known and may be cited as the Community Development Assistance Act.

Laws 2025, LB650, § 1.